Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5558.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-65-5 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-65 entitled "Contractors’
Registration and Licensing Board" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-65-5. Application for registration — Continuing education.
(a) A person who wishes to register as a contractor shall submit an application in a manner
as prescribed by the board or office. The application shall include:
(1) A legible copy of a valid government issued identification;
(1)(2) Workers’ compensation insurance account number, or company name if a number
has not yet been obtained, if applicable;
(2)(3) Unemployment insurance account number, if applicable;
(3)(4) State withholding tax account number, if applicable;
(4)(5) Federal employer identification number, if applicable, or if self-employed and
participating in a retirement plan;
(5)(6)(i) The individual(s) name and business address and residential address of:
(A) Each partner or venturer, if the applicant is a partnership or joint venture;
(B) The owner, if the applicant is an individual proprietorship;
(C) The corporate officers, and a copy of the articles of incorporation filed with the Rhode
Island secretary of state’s office, if the applicant is a corporation; the members and managers and
a copy of the articles of organization filed with the Rhode Island secretary of state’s office if the

applicant is a limited liability company.
(ii) Post office boxes are not acceptable as the only address;
(6)(7) A statement as to whether or not the applicant has previously applied for registration,
or is or was an officer, manager, member, partner, or venturer of an applicant who previously
applied for registration and if so, the name of the corporation, limited liability company,
partnership, or venture; and
(7)(8) Valid insurance certificate for the type of work being performed and as required
under § 5-65-7.
(b) A person may be prohibited from registering or renewing a registration as a contractor
under the provisions of this chapter or his or her registration may be revoked or suspended if he or
she has any unsatisfied or outstanding judgments from arbitration, bankruptcy, courts, or
administrative agency against him or her relating to his or her work as a contractor, and provided,
further, that a statement shall be provided to the board attesting to the information herein.
(c) Failure to provide or falsified information on an application, or any document required
by this chapter, is punishable by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and/or denial
or revocation of the registration, or both.
(d) An applicant must be at least eighteen (18) years of age.
(e) For new applications, satisfactory proof shall be provided to the board evidencing the
completion of five (5) hours of preregistration education units as determined by the board pursuant
to established regulations.
(f) For renewal applications, satisfactory proof shall be provided to the board evidencing
the completion of two and one-half (2.5) hours of continuing education units that will be required
to be maintained by residential contractors as a condition of registration as determined by the board
pursuant to established regulations.
(g) A certification in a form issued by the board shall be completed upon registration or
license or renewal to ensure contractors are aware of certain provisions of this law and shall be
signed by the registrant before a registration can be issued or renewed.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001655
========
LC001655 - Page 2 of 3